California statutes. Penal Code
(4) The convicted person has made a prima facie showing that the evidence sought to be tested is material to the issue of the convicted person’s identity as the perpetrator of, or accomplice to, the crime, special circumstance, or enhancement allegation that resulted in the conviction or sentence. The convicted person is only required to demonstrate that the DNA testing
 they seek would be relevant to, rather than dispositive of, the issue of identity. The convicted person is not required to show a favorable result would conclusively establish their innocence.

(5) The requested DNA testing results would raise a reasonable probability that, in light of all the evidence, the convicted person’s verdict or sentence would have been more favorable if the results of DNA testing had been available at the time of conviction. The court in its discretion may consider any evidence whether or not it was introduced at trial. In determining whether the convicted person is entitled to develop potentially exculpatory evidence, the court shall not decide whether, assuming a DNA test result
 favorable to the convicted person,
 they are entitled to some form of ultimate relief.

(6) The evidence sought to be tested meets either of the following conditions:

(A) The evidence was not tested previously.

(B) The evidence was tested previously, but the requested DNA test would provide results that are reasonably more discriminating and probative of the identity of the perpetrator or accomplice or have a reasonable probability of contradicting prior test results.

(7) The testing requested employs a method generally accepted within the relevant scientific community.

(8) The motion is not made solely for the purpose of delay.

(h) (1) If the court grants the motion for DNA testing, the court order shall identify the specific evidence to be tested and the DNA technology to be used.

(2) The testing shall be conducted by a laboratory that meets the FBI Director’s Quality Assurance Standards and that is mutually agreed upon by the Attorney General or district attorney and the person filing the motion. If the parties cannot agree, the court shall designate a laboratory that meets the FBI Director’s Quality Assurance Standards. Laboratories accredited by the following
 entities have been determined to satisfy this requirement: the American Association for Laboratory Accreditation (A2LA), the American Society of Crime Laboratory Directors/Laboratory Accreditation Board (ASCLD/LAB), and Forensic Quality Services (ANSI-ASQ National Accreditation Board FQS).

(3) If the accredited laboratory selected by the parties or designated by the court to conduct DNA testing is not a National DNA Index System (NDIS) participating laboratory that takes or retains ownership of the DNA data for entry into the Combined DNA Index System (CODIS), the laboratory selected to perform DNA testing shall not initiate analysis for a specific case until documented approval has been obtained from an appropriate NDIS participating laboratory’s technical leader of acceptance of ownership of the DNA data from the selected laboratory that may be entered into or searched in CODIS.

(i) In accordance with the court’s order pursuant to subdivision (h), the laboratory may communicate with either party, upon request, during the testing process. The result of any testing ordered under this section shall be fully disclosed to the person filing the motion, the district attorney, and the Attorney General. If requested by any party, the court shall order production of the underlying laboratory data and notes.

(j) (1) The cost of DNA testing ordered under this section shall be borne by the state or the applicant, as the court may order in the interests of justice, if it is shown that the applicant is not indigent and possesses the ability to pay. However, the cost of any additional testing to be conducted by the district attorney or Attorney General shall not be borne by the convicted person.

(2) In order to pay the state’s share of
 any testing costs, the laboratory designated in subdivision (h) shall present its bill for services to the superior court for approval and payment. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate funds for this purpose in the 2000–01 Budget Act.

(k) An order granting or denying a motion for DNA testing under this section shall not be appealable, and shall be subject to review only through petition for writ of mandate or prohibition filed by the person seeking DNA testing, the district attorney, or the Attorney General. The petition shall be filed within 20 days after the court’s order granting or denying the motion for DNA testing. In a noncapital case, the petition for writ of mandate or prohibition shall be filed in the court of appeal. In a capital case, the petition shall be filed in the California Supreme Court. The court of appeal or California Supreme Court shall expedite its review of a petition for writ of mandate or prohibition
 filed under this subdivision.

(l) DNA testing ordered by the court pursuant to this section shall be done as soon as practicable. However, if the court finds that a miscarriage of justice will otherwise occur and that it is necessary in the interests of justice to give priority to the DNA testing, a DNA laboratory shall be required to give priority to the DNA testing ordered pursuant to this section over the laboratory’s other pending casework.

(m) DNA profile information from biological samples taken from a convicted person pursuant to a motion for postconviction DNA testing is exempt from any law requiring disclosure of information to the public.

(n) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the right to file a motion for postconviction DNA testing provided by this section is absolute and shall not be waived.
 This prohibition applies to, but is not limited to, a waiver that is given as part of an agreement resulting in a plea of guilty or nolo contendere.

(o) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 153, Sec. 2.   (AB 2521)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1405.1.

(a) When the court grants a motion for DNA testing pursuant to Section 1405 and a DNA profile of an unknown contributor is generated, the court may conduct a hearing to determine if the DNA profile should be uploaded into the State Index System, and if appropriate, the National DNA Index System. The court may issue an order directing the upload of the DNA profile into the State Index System, and if appropriate, the National DNA Index System, only if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The source of the DNA profile is attributable to the putative perpetrator of the crime.

(2) The profile meets all requirements, whether technical or
 otherwise, for permanent inclusion into the State Index System, and if appropriate, the National DNA Index System, as determined by the Department of Justice, the Federal Bureau of Investigation, federal law, and California law.

(3) The convicted person or convicted person’s counsel provides written notice to the California Combined DNA Index System (CODIS) State Administrator at the Department of Justice, the Attorney General, and the district attorney 30 court days prior to the hearing to determine if the DNA profile should be uploaded into the State Index System, and if appropriate, the National DNA Index System.

(b) A court shall not order an upload of a DNA profile into the State Index System or the National DNA Index System that violates any CODIS or state rule, policy, or regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 554, Sec. 2.   (SB 980)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Disposal of Property Stolen or Embezzled [1407. - 1413.]

1407.

When property, alleged to have been stolen or embezzled, comes into the custody of a peace officer, he shall hold it subject to the provisions of this chapter relating to the disposal thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 774.)
-------------------------------------------

1408.

On the application of the owner and on satisfactory proof of his ownership of the property, after reasonable notice and opportunity to be heard has been given to the person from whom custody of the property was taken and any other person as required by the magistrate, the magistrate before whom the complaint is laid, or who examines the charge against the person accused of stealing or embezzling it, shall order it to be delivered, without prejudice to the state, to the owner, on his paying the necessary expenses incurred in its preservation, to be certified by the magistrate. The order entitles the owner to demand and receive the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 799.)
-------------------------------------------

1409.

If property stolen or embezzled comes into the custody of the magistrate, it shall be delivered, without prejudice to the state, to the owner upon his application to the court and on satisfactory proof of his title, after reasonable notice and opportunity to be heard has been given to the person from whom custody of the property was taken and any other person as required by the magistrate, and on his paying the necessary expenses incurred in its preservation, to be certified by the magistrate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 799.)
-------------------------------------------

1410.

If the property stolen or embezzled has not been delivered to the owner, the court before which a trial is had for stealing or embezzling it, upon the application of the owner to the court and on proof of his title, after reasonable notice and opportunity to be heard has been given to the person from whom custody of the property was taken and any other person as required by the court, may order it to be restored to the owner without prejudice to the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 799.)
-------------------------------------------

1411.

(a) If the ownership of the property stolen or embezzled and the address of the owner, and the address of the owner of a security interest therein, can be reasonably ascertained, the peace officer who took custody of the property shall notify the owner, and a person having a security interest therein, by letter of the location of the property and the method by which the owner may obtain it. This notice shall be given upon the conviction of a person for an offense involving the theft, embezzlement, or possession of the property, or if a conviction was not obtained, upon the making of a decision by the district attorney not to file the case or upon the termination of the proceedings in the case. Except as provided in Section 217 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, if the property stolen or
 embezzled is not claimed by the owner before the expiration of three months after the giving of this notice, or, in any case in which such a notice is not given, before the expiration of six months from the conviction of a person for an offense involving the theft, embezzlement, or possession of the property, or if a conviction was not obtained, then from the time the property came into the possession of the peace officer or the case involving the person from whom it was obtained is disposed of, whichever is later, the magistrate or other officer having it in custody may, on the payment of the necessary expenses incurred in its preservation, deliver it to the county treasurer or other proper county officer, by whom it shall be sold and the proceeds paid into the county treasury. However, notwithstanding any other law, if the person from whom custody of the property was taken is a secondhand dealer or licensed pawnbroker and reasonable but unsuccessful efforts have been made to notify the owner of the
 property and the property is no longer needed for the criminal proceeding, the property shall be returned to the secondhand dealer or pawnbroker who had custody of the property and be treated as regularly acquired property. If the property is transferred to the county purchasing agent it may be sold in the manner provided by Article 7 (commencing with Section 25500) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code for the sale of surplus personal property. If the county officer determines that any of the property transferred to him or her for sale is needed for a public use, the property may be retained by the county and need not be sold. The magistrate or other officer having the property in custody may, however, provide for the sale of the property in the manner provided for the sale of unclaimed property which has been held for at least three months pursuant to Section 2080.4 of the Civil Code.

(b) This section shall
 not govern the disposition of property placed on hold pursuant to Section 21647 of the Business and Professions Code, notwithstanding the current custodial status of the property, unless the licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer, after receipt of the written advisement required by subdivision (h) of Section 21647 of the Business and Professions Code, willfully refuses to consent to a statutory hold as provided by Section 21647 of the Business and Professions Code or a search warrant for the business of the licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer has resulted in the seizure of the property subject to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 318, Sec. 3.   (SB 762)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1412.

When money or other property is taken from a defendant, arrested upon a charge of a public offense, the officer taking it must at the time give duplicate receipts therefor, specifying particularly the amount of money or the kind of property taken; one of which receipts he must deliver to the defendant and the other of which he must forthwith file with the Clerk of the Court to which the depositions and statement are to be sent. When such property is taken by a police officer of any incorporated city or town, he must deliver one of the receipts to the defendant, and one, with the property, at once to the Clerk or other person in charge of the police office in such city or town.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1413.

(a) The clerk or person having charge of the property section for any police department in any incorporated city or town, or for any sheriff’s department in any county, shall enter in a suitable book a description of every article of property alleged to be stolen or embezzled, and brought into the office or taken from the person of a prisoner, and shall attach a number to each article, and make a corresponding entry thereof. He may engrave or imbed an identification number in property described in Section 537e for the purposes thereof.

(b) The clerk or person in charge of the property section may, upon satisfactory proof of the ownership of property held pursuant to Section 1407, and upon presentation of proper personal identification, deliver it to the owner. Such delivery shall be without prejudice to the state or to the person from whom custody of the property was taken or to any other person who may have a claim against the property. Prior to such delivery such clerk or person in charge of the property section shall make and retain a complete photographic record of such property. The person to whom property is delivered shall sign, under penalty of perjury, a declaration of ownership, which shall be retained by the clerk or person in charge of the property section. This subdivision shall not apply to any property subject to forfeiture under any provision of law. This subdivision shall not apply unless the clerk or person in charge of the property section has served upon the person from whom custody of the property was taken a notice of a claim of ownership and a copy of the satisfactory proof of ownership tendered and has allowed such person reasonable opportunity to be heard as to why the property should not be delivered to the person claiming ownership.

If the person upon whom a notice of claim and proof of ownership has been served does not respond asserting a claim to the property within 15 days from the date of receipt of the service, the property may be disposed of in a manner not inconsistent with the provisions of this section.

(c) The magistrate before whom the complaint is laid, or who examines the charge against the person accused of stealing or embezzling the property, or the court before which a trial is had for stealing or embezzling it, shall upon application by the person from whom custody of the property was taken, review the determination of the clerk or person in charge of the property section, and may order the property taken into the custody of the court upon a finding that the person to whom the property was delivered is not entitled thereto. Such court shall make its determination in the same manner as a determination is made when the matter is before the court pursuant to Sections 1408 to 1410, inclusive.

(d) The clerk or person in charge of the property section is not liable in damages for any official action performed hereunder in good faith.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 332.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. Disposition of Evidence in Criminal Cases [1417. - 1417.9.]

1417.

All exhibits which have been introduced or filed in any criminal action or proceeding shall be retained by the clerk of the court who shall establish a procedure to account for the exhibits properly, subject to Sections 1417.2 and 1417.3 until final determination of the action or proceedings and the exhibits shall thereafter be distributed or disposed of as provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 382, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1417.1.

No order shall be made for the destruction of an exhibit prior to the final determination of the action or proceeding. For the purposes of this chapter, the date when a criminal action or proceeding becomes final is as follows:

(a) When no notice of appeal is filed, 30 days after the last day for filing that notice.

(b) When a notice of appeal is filed, 30 days after the date the clerk of the court receives the remittitur affirming the judgment.

(c) When an order for a rehearing, a new trial, or other proceeding is granted and the ordered
 proceedings have not been commenced within one year thereafter, one year after the date of that order.

(d) (1) In cases where the death penalty is imposed, 30 days after the date of execution of sentence.

(2) In cases where the death penalty is imposed and the defendant dies while awaiting execution, one year after the date of the defendant’s death.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 283, Sec. 2.   (SB 1489)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1417.2.

Notwithstanding Section 1417.5, the court may, on application of the party entitled thereto or an agent designated in writing by the owner, order an exhibit delivered to that party at any time prior to the final determination of the action or proceeding, upon stipulation of the parties or upon notice and motion if both of the following requirements are met:

(a) No prejudice will be suffered by either party.

(b) A full and complete photographic record is made of the exhibits so released.

The party to whom the exhibit is being returned shall provide the photographic record. This section shall not apply to any material, the release of which is prohibited by Section 1417.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 875, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1417.3.

(a) At any time prior to the final determination of the action or proceeding, exhibits offered by the state or defendant shall be returned to the party offering them by order of the court when an exhibit poses a security, storage, or safety problem, as recommended by the clerk of the court. If an exhibit by its nature is severable the court shall order the clerk to retain a portion of the exhibit not exceeding three pounds by weight or one cubic foot by volume and shall order the return of the balance of the exhibit to the district attorney. The clerk, upon court order, shall substitute a full and complete photographic record of any exhibit or part of any exhibit returned to the state under this section. The party to whom the exhibit is being returned shall provide the photographic record.

(b) Exhibits toxic by their nature that pose a health hazard to humans shall be introduced to the court in the form of a photographic record and a written chemical analysis certified by competent authority. Where the court finds that good cause exists to depart from this procedure, toxic exhibits may be brought into the courtroom and introduced. However, following introduction of the exhibit, the person or persons previously in possession of the exhibit shall take responsibility for it and the court shall not be required to store the exhibit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 382, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1417.5.

Except as provided in Section 1417.6, 60 days after the final determination of a criminal action or proceeding, the clerk of the court shall dispose of all exhibits introduced or filed in the case and remaining in the clerk’s possession, as follows:

(a) If the name and address of the person from whom the exhibit was taken is contained in the court record, the clerk shall notify the person that he or she may make application to the court for release of the exhibits within 15 days of receipt of the notification.

(b) The court shall order the release of exhibits free of charge, without prejudice to the state, upon application, to the following:

(1) First, the person from whom the exhibits were taken into custody, provided that the person was in lawful possession of the exhibits.

(2) Second, a person establishing title to, or a right to possession of, the exhibits.

(c) If the party entitled to an exhibit fails to apply for the return of the exhibit prior to the date for disposition under this section, the following procedures shall apply:

(1) Exhibits of stolen or embezzled property other than money shall be disposed of pursuant to court order as provided in Section 1417.6.

(2) Exhibits of property other than property which is stolen or embezzled or property which consists of money or currency shall, except as otherwise provided in this paragraph and in paragraph (3), be transferred to the appropriate county agency for sale to the public in the same manner provided by Article 7 (commencing with Section 25500) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code for the sale of surplus personal property. If the county determines that any property is needed for a public use, the property may be retained by the county and need not be sold.

(3) Exhibits of property, other than money, currency, or stolen or embezzled property, that are determined by the court to have no value at public sale shall be destroyed or otherwise disposed of pursuant to court order.

(4) Exhibits of money or currency shall be disposed of pursuant to Section 1420.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 133, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1417.6.

(a) The provisions of Section 1417.5 shall not apply to any dangerous or deadly weapons, narcotic or poisonous drugs, explosives, or any property of any kind or character whatsoever the possession of which is prohibited by law and that was used by a defendant in the commission of the crime of which the defendant was convicted, or with which the defendant was armed or that the defendant had upon his or her person at the time of the defendant’s arrest.

Any of this property introduced or filed as an exhibit shall be, by order of the trial court, destroyed or otherwise disposed of under the conditions provided in the order no sooner than 60 days following the final determination of the criminal action or
 proceeding.

(b) (1) Every person who knowingly has in his or her possession any tool or device that is seized and of a type used in the commission of a violation of Section 10801, 10802, or 10803 of the Vehicle Code, shall be subject to having the tool or device intended for the above purpose deemed a nuisance as provided in paragraph (2).

(2) An evidentiary hearing shall be held only upon conviction of the defendant for a violation of Section 10801, 10802, or 10803 of the Vehicle Code and after 15 days’ notice is given to the defendant of the state’s intent to declare as a nuisance any property that is described in paragraph (1). All relevant evidence shall be admissible at the hearing and the state shall prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the property seized is of a type used in facilitating the commission of the crime of which the defendant was
 convicted.

(3) If a person purports to be the lawful owner of any tool or device the state seeks to be declared a nuisance, the person shall show proof by a preponderance of the evidence at the hearing pursuant to paragraph (2), that he or she owns the tool or device, and the illegal use of the tool or device was without his or her knowledge or consent.

(4) Following a determination that the property shall be declared a nuisance, the property shall be disposed of as provided in paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 1417.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 709, Sec. 17.   (SB 1062)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1417.7.

Not less than 15 days before any proposed disposition of an exhibit pursuant to Section 1417.3, 1417.5, or 1417.6, the court shall notify the district attorney or other prosecuting attorney, the attorney of record for each party, and each party who is not represented by counsel of the proposed disposition. Before the disposition, any party, at his or her own expense, may cause to be prepared a photographic or digital record of all or part of the exhibit by a person who is not a party or attorney of a party. The clerk of the court shall observe the taking of the photographic or digital record and, upon receipt of a declaration of the person making the photographic or digital record that the duplicate delivered to the clerk is
 a true, unaltered, and unretouched duplicate of the photographic or digital
 record taken in the presence of the clerk, the clerk shall certify the photographic or digital record as such without charge and retain it unaltered for a period of 60 days following the final determination of the criminal action or proceeding. For purposes of this section, a “photographic record” of the exhibit means a photographic image of the exhibit or its equivalent stored in any form. For purposes of this section, a “duplicate” means a counterpart produced by a mechanical, photographic, chemical, electronic, or other equivalent process or technique that accurately reproduces the original. A certified photographic or digital record of exhibits shall not be deemed inadmissible pursuant to Section 1521 or 1522 of the Evidence Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 566, Sec. 3.   (SB 238)   Effective October 7, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1417.8.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the court shall direct that any photograph of any minor that has been found by the court to be harmful matter, as defined in Section 313, and introduced or filed as an exhibit in any criminal proceeding specified in subdivision (b) be handled as follows:

(1) Prior to the final determination of the action or proceeding, the photograph shall be available only to the parties or to a person named in a court order to receive the photograph.

(2) After the final determination of the action or proceeding, the photograph shall be preserved with the permanent record maintained by the clerk of the court. The photograph may be disposed of or destroyed after preservation through any appropriate photographic or electronic medium. If the photograph is disposed of, it shall be rendered unidentifiable before the disposal. No person shall have access to the photograph unless that person has been named in a court order to receive the photograph. Any copy, negative, reprint, or other duplication of the photograph in the possession of the state, a state agency, the defendant, or an agent of the defendant, shall be delivered to the clerk of the court for disposal whether or not the defendant was convicted of the offense.

(b) The procedure provided by subdivision (a) shall apply to actions listed under subdivision (c) of Section 290, and to acts under the following provisions:

(1) Section 261.5.

(2) Section 272.

(3) Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 311) of Title 9 of Part 1.

(4) Chapter 7.6 (commencing with Section 313) of Title 9 of Part 1.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “photograph” means any photographic image contained in a digital format or on any chemical, mechanical, magnetic, or electronic medium.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 579, Sec. 43.   Effective October 13, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1417.9.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law and subject to subdivisions (b) and (c), the appropriate governmental entity shall retain any object or material that contains or includes biological material that is secured in connection with a criminal case for the period of time that any person remains incarcerated in connection with that case. The governmental entity shall have the discretion to determine how the evidence is retained pursuant to this section, provided that the evidence is retained in a condition suitable for deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) testing.

(b) A governmental entity may dispose of any object or material that contains or includes biological material before the expiration of the period of time described in subdivision (a) if all of the conditions set forth
 below are met:

(1) The governmental entity notifies all of the following persons of the provisions of this section and of the intention of the governmental entity to dispose of the material:

(A) Any person, who as a result of a felony conviction in the case is currently serving a term of imprisonment and who remains incarcerated in connection with the case. This notification shall be sent to the current location where the person is incarcerated.

(B) Any counsel of record.

(C) The public defender in the county of conviction.

(D) The district attorney in the county of conviction.

(E) The Attorney General.

(2) The notifying entity does not receive, within 180 days of sending the notification, any of the following:

(A) A motion filed pursuant to Section 1405. However, upon filing of that motion, the governmental entity shall retain the material only until the time that the court’s denial of the motion is final.

(B) A request under penalty of perjury that the material not be destroyed or disposed of because the declarant will file a motion for DNA testing pursuant to Section 1405 within one year, unless a request for an extension is requested by the convicted person and agreed to by the governmental entity in possession of the evidence.

(C) A declaration of innocence filed with the court under penalty of perjury. However, the court shall permit the destruction
 of the evidence upon a showing that the declaration is false or there is no issue of identity that would be affected by additional testing. The convicted person may be cross-examined on the declaration at any hearing conducted under this section or on an application by or on behalf of the convicted person filed pursuant to Section 1405.

(3) No other law requires that biological evidence be preserved or retained.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the right to receive notice pursuant to this section is absolute and shall not be waived. This prohibition applies to, but is not limited to, a waiver that is given as part of an agreement resulting in a plea of guilty or nolo contendere.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 972, Sec. 1.   (AB 2988)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Disposition of Unclaimed Money Held by District Attorney or Court Clerk [1420. - 1422.]

1420.

All money received by a district attorney or clerk of the court in any criminal action or proceeding, the owner or owners of which are unknown, and which remains unclaimed in the possession of the district attorney or clerk of the court after final judgment in the criminal action or proceeding, shall be deposited with the county treasurer. Upon the expiration of two years after the deposit, the county treasurer shall cause a notice pursuant to Section 1421 to be published in the county once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 875, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1421.

The notice shall state the amount of money, the criminal action or proceeding in which the money was received by the district attorney or clerk of the court, the fund in which it is held and that it is proposed that the money will become the property of the county on a designated date not less than 45 days nor more than 60 days after the first publication of the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 875, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

1422.

Unless some person files a verified complaint seeking to recover all, or a designated part, of the money in a court of competent jurisdiction within the county in which the notice is published, and serves a copy of the complaint and the summons issued thereon upon the county treasurer before the date designated in the notice, upon that date the money becomes the property of the county and shall be transferred by the treasurer to the general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. Disqualification of Prosecuting Attorneys [1424. - 1424.5.]

1424.

(a) (1) Notice of a motion to disqualify a district attorney from performing an authorized duty shall be served on the district attorney and the Attorney General at least 10 court days before the motion is heard. The notice of motion shall contain a statement of the facts setting forth the grounds for the claimed disqualification and the legal authorities relied upon by the moving party and shall be supported by affidavits of witnesses who are competent to testify to the facts set forth in the affidavit. The district attorney or the Attorney General, or both, may file affidavits in opposition to the motion and may appear at the hearing on the motion and may file with the court hearing the motion a
 written opinion on the disqualification issue. The judge shall review the affidavits and determine whether or not an evidentiary hearing is necessary. The motion may not be granted unless the evidence shows that a conflict of interest exists that would render it unlikely that the defendant would receive a fair trial. An order recusing the district attorney from any proceeding may be reviewed by extraordinary writ or may be appealed by the district attorney or the Attorney General. The order recusing the district attorney shall be stayed pending any review authorized by this section. If the motion is brought at or before the preliminary hearing, it may not be renewed in the trial court on the basis of facts that were raised or could have been raised at the time of the original motion.

(2) An appeal from an order of recusal or from a case
 involving a charge punishable as a felony shall be made pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1235) of Title 9, regardless of the court in which the order is made. An appeal from an order of recusal in a misdemeanor case shall be made pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1466) of Title 11, regardless of the court in which the order is made.

(b) (1) Notice of a motion to disqualify a city attorney or city prosecutor from performing an authorized duty involving a criminal matter shall be served on the city attorney or city prosecutor and the district attorney at least 10 court days before the motion is heard. The notice of motion shall set forth a statement of the facts relevant to the claimed disqualification and the legal authorities relied on by the moving party. The district attorney may
 appear at the hearing on the motion and may file with the court hearing the motion a written opinion on the disqualification issue. The motion may not be granted unless the evidence shows that a conflict of interest exists that would render it unlikely that the defendant would receive a fair trial.

(2) An order recusing the city attorney or city prosecutor from a proceeding may be appealed by the city attorney or city prosecutor or the district attorney. The order recusing the city attorney or city prosecutor shall be stayed pending an appeal authorized by this section. An appeal from an order of disqualification in a misdemeanor case shall be made pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1466) of Title 11.

(c) Motions to disqualify the city attorney or city prosecutor and
 the district attorney shall be separately made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 299, Sec. 2.   (AB 1418)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1424.5.

(a) (1) Upon receiving information that a prosecuting attorney may have deliberately and intentionally withheld relevant, material exculpatory evidence or information in violation of law, a court may make a finding, supported by clear and convincing evidence, that a violation occurred. If the court finds such a violation, the court shall inform the State Bar of California of that violation if the prosecuting attorney acted in bad faith and the impact of the withholding contributed to a guilty verdict, guilty or nolo contendere plea, or, if identified before conclusion of trial, seriously limited the ability of a defendant to present a defense.

(2) A court may hold a hearing to consider whether a
 violation occurred pursuant to paragraph (1).

(b) (1) If a court finds, pursuant to subdivision (a), that a violation occurred in bad faith, the court may disqualify an individual prosecuting attorney from a case.

(2) Upon a determination by a court to disqualify an individual prosecuting attorney pursuant to paragraph (1), the defendant or his or her counsel may file and serve a notice of a motion pursuant to Section 1424 to disqualify the prosecuting attorney’s office if there is sufficient evidence that other employees of the prosecuting attorney’s office knowingly and in bad faith participated in or sanctioned the intentional withholding of the relevant, material exculpatory evidence or information and that withholding is part of a pattern and practice of violations.

(c) This section does
 not limit the authority or discretion of, or any requirement placed upon, the court or other individuals to make reports to the State Bar of California regarding the same conduct, or otherwise limit other available legal authority, requirements, remedies, or actions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 59, Sec. 7.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 11. PROCEEDINGS IN MISDEMEANOR AND INFRACTION CASES AND APPEALS FROM SUCH CASES [1427. - 1471.]



  CHAPTER 1. Proceedings in Misdemeanor and Infraction Cases [1427. - 1465.9.]

1427.
